California statutes. Penal Code
(c) The manufacture of a large-capacity magazine for export or for sale to government agencies or the military pursuant to applicable federal regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32445.

Section 32310 does not apply to the loan of a large-capacity magazine for use solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32450.

Section 32310 does not apply to the purchase or possession of a large-capacity magazine by the holder of a special weapons permit issued pursuant to Section 31000, 32650, or 33300, or pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of this division, for any of the following purposes:

(a) For use solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production.

(b) For export pursuant to federal regulations.

(c) For resale to law enforcement agencies, government agencies, or the military, pursuant to applicable federal
 regulations.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.9.)
-------------------------------------------

32455.

Section 32310 does not apply to the sale, gift, or loan of a large-capacity magazine to a person enrolled in the course of basic training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or any other course certified by the commission, nor to the possession of, or purchase by, the person, for purposes of participation in the course during his or her period of enrollment. Upon completion of the course the large-capacity magazine shall be removed from the state, sold to a licensed firearms dealer, or surrendered to a law enforcement agency, unless another exemption to Section 32310 applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 783, Sec. 4.   (AB 693)   Effective October 14, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Machineguns [32610. - 32750.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [32610. - 32610.]

32610.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect or apply to any of the following:

(a) The sale to, purchase by, or possession of machineguns by a police department, a sheriff’s office, a marshal’s office, a district attorney’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections for use by the department’s Special Emergency Response Teams and Law Enforcement Liaison/Investigations Unit, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States for use in the discharge of their official duties, provided, however, that any sale to these entities be transacted by a person who is permitted pursuant to Section 32650 and licensed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section
 32700).

(b) The possession of machineguns by regular, salaried, full-time peace officer members of a police department, sheriff’s office, marshal’s office, district attorney’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, or the Department of Corrections for use by the department’s Special Emergency Response Teams and Law Enforcement Liaison/Investigations Unit, when on duty and if the use is within the scope of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unlawful Acts Relating to Machineguns [32625. - 32625.]

32625.

(a) Any person, firm, or corporation, who within this state possesses or knowingly transports a machinegun, except as authorized by this chapter, is guilty of a public offense and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person, firm, or corporation who within this state intentionally converts a firearm into a machinegun, or who sells, or offers for sale, or knowingly manufactures a machinegun, except as authorized by this chapter, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for four, six, or eight
 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 553.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amendment operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Permits [32650. - 32670.]

32650.

(a) The Department of Justice may issue permits for the possession, manufacture, and transportation or possession, manufacture, or transportation of machineguns, upon a satisfactory showing that good cause exists for the issuance of the permit to the applicant. No permit shall be issued to a person who is under 18 years of age.

(b) A permit for possession issued pursuant to this section may only be issued to an individual, and may not be issued to a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or any other group or entity, regardless of how that entity was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   (AB 170)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

32655.

(a) An application for a permit under this article shall satisfy all of the following conditions:

(1) It shall be filed in writing.

(2) It shall be signed by the applicant if an individual, or by a member or officer qualified to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation.

(3) It shall state the applicant’s name.

(4) It shall state the business in which the applicant is engaged.

(5) It shall state the applicant’s business address.

(6) It shall include a full description of the use to which the firearms are to be put.

(b) Applications and permits shall be uniform throughout the state on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(c) Each applicant for a permit shall pay at the time of filing the application a fee determined by the Department of Justice. The fee shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(d) A permit granted pursuant to this article may be renewed one year from the date of issuance, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a permit renewal fee, which shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(e) After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged shall increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustments for the department’s budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32660.

Every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued under this article shall keep it on the person or at the place where the firearms are kept. The permit shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or any other person designated by the authority issuing the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32665.

A permit issued in accordance with this chapter may be revoked by the issuing authority at any time, when it appears that the need for the firearms has ceased or that the holder of the permit has used the firearms for purposes other than those allowed by the permit or that the holder of the permit has not exercised great care in retaining custody of any weapons possessed under the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32670.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall, for every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued pursuant to this article, annually conduct an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile the inventory of machineguns.

(b) A person, firm, or corporation with an inventory of fewer than five devices that require any Department of Justice permit shall be subject to an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile inventory, once every five years, or more frequently if determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses to Sell Machineguns [32700. - 32720.]

32700.

The Department of Justice may grant a license to permit the sale of machineguns at the place specified in the license, subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The business shall be carried on only in the place designated in the license.

(b) The license or a certified copy of the license must be displayed on the premises in a place where it may easily be read.

(c) No machinegun shall be delivered to any person not authorized to receive the machinegun under the provisions of this chapter.

(d) A complete record must be
 kept of sales made under the authority of the license, showing the name and address of the purchaser, the descriptions and serial numbers of the weapons purchased, the number and date of issue of the purchaser’s permit, if any, and the signature of the purchaser or purchasing agent. This record shall be open to the inspection of any peace officer or other person designated by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32705.

An application for a license under this article shall satisfy all of the following conditions:

(a) It shall be filed in writing.

(b) It shall be signed by the applicant if an individual, or by a member or officer qualified to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation.

(c) It shall state the applicant’s name.

(d) It shall state the business in which the applicant is engaged.

(e) It shall state the applicant’s business address.

(f) It shall include a full description of the use to which the firearms are to be put.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32710.

(a) Applications and licenses under this article shall be uniform throughout the state, on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(b) A license under this article shall be effective for not more than one year from the date of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32715.

(a) Each applicant for a license under this article shall pay at the time of filing the application a fee determined by the Department of Justice. The fee shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(b) A license granted pursuant to this article may be renewed one year from the date of issuance, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a license renewal fee, which shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(c) After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees
 charged shall increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustments for the department’s budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32720.

Upon breach of any of the conditions stated in Section 32700, a license under this article shall be revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Machinegun Constituting Nuisance [32750. - 32750.]

32750.

(a) It shall be a public nuisance to possess any machinegun in violation of this chapter.

(b) The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney may bring an action before the superior court to enjoin the possession of any machinegun in violation of this chapter.

(c) Any machinegun found to be in violation of this chapter shall be surrendered to the Department of Justice. The department shall destroy the machinegun so as to render it unusable and unrepairable as a machinegun, except upon the filing of a certificate with the department by a judge or district attorney stating that the preservation of the machinegun is
 necessary to serve the ends of justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Multiburst Trigger Activator [32900. - 32990.]

32900.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any multiburst trigger activator is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 108.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

32990.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any multiburst trigger activator is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Short-Barreled Rifle or Short-Barreled Shotgun [33210. - 33320.]



  ARTICLE 1. Restrictions Relating to Short-Barreled Rifle or Short-Barreled Shotgun [33210. - 33290.]

33210.

Except as expressly provided in Sections 33215 to 33225, inclusive, and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, and solely in accordance with those provisions, no person may manufacture, import into this state, keep for sale, offer for sale, give, lend, or possess any short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun. Nothing else in any provision listed in Section 16580 shall be construed as authorizing the manufacture, importation into the state, keeping for sale, offering for sale, or giving, lending, or possession of any short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33215.

Except as provided in Sections 33220 and 33225 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 109.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

33220.

Section 33215 does not apply to either of the following:

(a) The sale to, purchase by, or possession of short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns by a police department, sheriff’s office, marshal’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, for use in the discharge of their official duties.

(b) The possession of short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns by peace officer members of a police department, sheriff’s office, marshal’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, or
 the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, when on duty and the use is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties, and the officers have completed a training course in the use of these weapons certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33225.

Section 33215 does not apply to the manufacture, possession, transportation, or sale of a short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun, when authorized by the Department of Justice pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) and not in violation of federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33290.

Except as provided in Sections 33220 and 33225 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permit for Short-Barreled Rifle or Short-Barreled Shotgun  [33300. - 33320.]

33300.

(a) Upon a showing that good cause exists for issuance of a permit to the applicant, and if the Department of Justice finds that issuance of the permit does not endanger the public safety, the department may issue a permit for the manufacture, possession, importation, transportation, or sale of short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns. The permit shall be initially valid for a period of one year, and renewable annually thereafter. No permit shall be issued to a person who is under 18 years of age.

(b) Good cause, for the purposes of this section, shall be limited to only the following:

(1) The permit is sought for the
 manufacture, possession, importation, or use with blank cartridges, of a short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun, solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production or entertainment event.

(2) The permit is sought for the manufacture of, exposing for sale, keeping for sale, sale of, importation or lending of short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns to the entities listed in Section 33220 by persons who are licensed as dealers or manufacturers under the provisions of Chapter 53 (commencing with Section 5801) of Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 1559)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

33305.

(a) An application for a permit under this article shall satisfy all of the following conditions:

(1) It shall be filed in writing.

(2) It shall be signed by the applicant if an individual, or by a member or officer qualified to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation.

(3) It shall state the applicant’s name.

(4) It shall state the business in which the applicant is engaged.

(5) It shall state the applicant’s business address.

(6) It shall include a full description of the use to which the short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns are to be put.

(b) Applications and permits shall be uniform throughout the state on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(c) Each applicant for a permit shall pay at the time of filing the application a fee determined by the Department of Justice. The fee shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(d) A permit granted pursuant to this article may be renewed one year from the date of issuance, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a permit renewal fee, which shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice.

(e) After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged shall increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustments for the department’s budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33310.

(a) Every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued under this article shall keep it on the person or at the place where the short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns are kept. The permit shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or any other person designated by the authority issuing the permit.

(b) Every short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun possessed pursuant to the provisions of this article shall bear a unique identifying number. If a weapon does not bear a unique identifying number, the Department of Justice shall assign a number which shall be placed or stamped on that weapon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33315.

A permit issued in accordance with this article may be revoked by the issuing authority at any time, when it appears that the need for the short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns has ceased or that the holder of the permit has used the short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns for purposes other than those allowed by the permit or that the holder of the permit has not exercised great care in retaining custody of any weapons possessed under the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

33320.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall, for every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued pursuant to this article, annually conduct an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile the inventory of short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns.

(b) A person, firm, or corporation with an inventory of fewer than five devices that require any Department of Justice permit shall be subject to an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile inventory, once every five years, or more frequently if determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Silencers [33410. - 33415.]

33410.

Any person, firm, or corporation who within this state possesses a silencer is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 554.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

33415.

Section 33410 shall not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(a) The sale to, purchase by, or possession of silencers by agencies listed in Section 830.1, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, for use in the discharge of their official duties.

(b) The possession of silencers by regular, salaried, full-time peace officers who are employed by an agency listed in Section 830.1, or by the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, when on duty and when the use of silencers is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties.

(c) The manufacture, possession, transportation, or sale or other transfer of silencers to an entity described in subdivision (a) by dealers or manufacturers registered under Chapter 53 (commencing with Section 5801) of Title 26 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Zip Guns [33600. - 33690.]

33600.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any zip gun is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 110.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

33690.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any zip gun is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Firearm Barrel [33700. - 33700.]

33700.

(a) (1) A firearm barrel, as defined in Section 16525, shall not be sold or transferred unless that transaction is completed in person by a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2027, a firearm barrel, as defined in Section 16525, shall not be sold or transferred unless that
 transaction is completed in person by a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and the licensed firearms dealer has conducted an eligibility check to determine if that the person is authorized to purchase a firearm barrel under subdivision (b) in a manner prescribed by the
 Department of Justice.

(3) No person shall possess with the intent to sell or offer to sell a firearm barrel in violation of this section.

(b) A person is authorized to purchase or
 otherwise acquire
 a firearm barrel if they meet the following criteria:

(1) They are at least 18 years of age.

(2) They are not prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm under state or federal law.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2027, the licensed firearms dealer shall legibly record all of the following on a form to be prescribed by the
 department pertaining to the sale or transfer of the firearm barrel:

(1) The date of the sale or transfer.

(2) The purchaser’s or transferee’s driver’s license or other identification number and the state in which it was issued.

(3) The make, model, and caliber of the firearm that the firearm barrel is designed for or used in.

(4) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full name.

(5) The name of the salesperson who processed the sale or transfer.

(6) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full residential address and telephone
 number.

(7) The purchaser’s or transferee’s date of birth.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2027, a licensed firearms dealer shall electronically submit to the department the information required by subdivision (c) for all sales and transfers of ownership of a firearm barrel.

(e) The department is authorized to adopt regulations to implement this act.

(f) (1) A first violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

(2) A second violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable as a misdemeanor by up to one year in jail and a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) A
 third violation of subdivision (a), and any subsequent violation thereafter of subdivision (a), shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(g) The following are exempt from the process outlined in this
 section:

(1) Sales or transfers to federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies.

(2) Sales or transfers to a federal firearms licensee.

(3) Sales or transfers to the United States military.

(4) Sales or transfers to a person who, in the same transaction, is separately purchasing a firearm and undergoing a state and federal firearm eligibility check pursuant to Section 28220.

(5) Sales or transfers to a
 federally licensed collector who is acquiring or being loaned the barrel of a firearm that is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, who has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the department pursuant to Section 26710.

(6) Transfers to or from the public administrator, public guardian, public conservator, the executor, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or administrator of an estate. Any transfers or sales from these persons to any third party other than law enforcement or a licensed firearms dealer shall be conducted by a
 licensed firearms dealer and is subject to the requirements of this section.

(7) A barrel that is attached to or affixed to a firearm.

(8) The sale or other transfer of ownership of a firearm barrel if the sale or other transfer of ownership is to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, and the entity is acquiring the firearm barrel as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals. All such barrels shall be disposed of pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(h) The department is authorized to adopt regulations to implement
 the provisions of this section.

(i) The department shall require the licensed firearms dealer to charge each firearm barrel purchaser or transferee a fee of up to 5 dollars ($5) to conduct the eligibility check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), but shall not to exceed the department’s actual processing costs. The fee may be increased each year by an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1) as necessary to reimburse the department for costs to conduct the eligibility check.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 11. FIREARM IN CUSTODY OF COURT OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR SIMILAR SITUATION [33800. - 34010.]



  CHAPTER 1. Procedure for Taking Firearm into Custody [33800. - 33800.]

33800.

(a) When a firearm is taken into custody by a law enforcement officer, the officer shall issue the person who possessed the firearm a receipt describing the firearm, and listing any serial number or other identification on the firearm.

(b) The receipt shall indicate where the firearm may be recovered, any applicable time limit for recovery, and the date after which the owner or possessor may recover the firearm pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850).

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to displace any existing law regarding the seizure or return of firearms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Return or Transfer of Firearm in Custody or Control of Court or Law Enforcement Agency [33850. - 33895.]

33850.

(a) Any person who claims title to any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition that is in the custody or control of a court or law enforcement agency and who wishes to have the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition returned shall make application for a determination by the Department of Justice as to whether the applicant is eligible to possess a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition. The application shall be submitted electronically via the California Firearms Application Reporting System (CFARS) and shall include the following:

(1) The applicant’s name, date and place of birth, gender, telephone number, and complete address.

(2) Whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the application shall also include the applicant’s country of citizenship and the applicant’s United States Citizenship and Immigration Services-assigned number or I-94 number.

(3) If the seized property is a firearm, the firearm’s make, model, caliber, barrel length, type, country of origin, and serial number, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, there shall be a place on the application to note that fact.

(4) For residents of California, the applicant’s valid California driver’s license number or
 valid California identification card number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. For nonresidents of California, a copy of the applicant’s military identification with orders indicating that the individual is stationed in California, or a copy of the applicant’s valid driver’s license from the applicant’s state of residence, or a copy of the applicant’s state identification card from the applicant’s state of residence. Copies of the documents provided by non-California residents shall be notarized.

(5) The name of the court or law enforcement agency holding the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(6) The signature of the applicant and the date of signature.

(7) Any person furnishing a fictitious name
 or address or knowingly furnishing any incorrect information or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the application, including any notarized information pursuant to paragraph (4), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person who owns a firearm that is in the custody of a court or law enforcement agency and who does not wish to obtain possession of the firearm, and the firearm is an otherwise legal firearm, and the person otherwise has right to title of the firearm, shall be entitled to sell or transfer title of the firearm to a licensed dealer or a third party that is not prohibited from possessing that firearm. Any sale or transfer to a third party pursuant to this subdivision shall be conducted pursuant to Section 27545.

(c) A person who owns an
 ammunition feeding device or ammunition that is in the custody of a court or a law enforcement agency and who does not wish to obtain possession of the ammunition or ammunition feeding device, and the ammunition feeding device or ammunition is otherwise legal, shall be entitled to sell or otherwise transfer the ammunition feeding device or ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer or ammunition vendor or a third party that is not prohibited from possessing that ammunition feeding device or ammunition. Any sale or other transfer of ammunition to a third party pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be conducted through an ammunition vendor in accordance with the procedures set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 30370) of Chapter 1 of Division 10.

(d) Any person furnishing a fictitious name or address, or knowingly furnishing any
 incorrect information or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the application, including any notarized information pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 53.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

33855.

A law enforcement agency or court that has taken custody of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition shall not return the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition to any individual unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The individual presents to the agency or court notification of a determination by the department pursuant to Section 33865 that the person is eligible to possess a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(b) If the seized property is a firearm and the agency or court has direct access to the Automated Firearms System, the agency or court has verified that the firearm is not listed as stolen pursuant to Section 11108.2, and that the
 firearm has been recorded in the Automated Firearms System in the name of the individual who seeks its return.

(c) If the firearm has been reported lost or stolen pursuant to Section 11108.2, a law enforcement agency shall notify the owner or person entitled to possession pursuant to Section 11108.5. However, that person shall provide proof of eligibility to possess a firearm pursuant to Section 33865.

(d) This section does not prevent the local law enforcement agency from charging the rightful owner or person entitled to possession of the firearm the fees described in Section 33880. However, an individual who is applying for a background check to retrieve a firearm that came into the custody or control of a court or law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 33850 shall be exempt from the fees in Section 33860, provided that the court or agency determines the firearm was reported
 stolen to a law enforcement agency prior to the date the firearm came into custody or control of the court or law enforcement agency, or within five business days of the firearm being stolen from its owner. The court or agency shall notify the Department of Justice of this fee exemption in a manner prescribed by the department.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 864, Sec. 7.6.   (AB 2222)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33860.

(a) The Department of Justice shall establish a fee of twenty dollars ($20) per request for return of a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or any quantity of ammunition plus a three-dollar ($3) charge for each additional firearm being processed as part of the request to return a firearm, to cover its reasonable costs for processing applications submitted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(c) The department shall annually review and shall adjust the fees specified in subdivision (a), if necessary, to fully fund, but not to exceed the reasonable costs of processing
 applications submitted pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.
